Massachusetts, session 194th, S46.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the
end thereof the following subsection:-
(g)(1) A carrier or a utilization review organization that uses an artificial intelligence,
algorithm, or other software tool for the purpose of utilization review or utilization management
functions, based in whole or in part on medical necessity, or that contracts with or otherwise
works through an entity that uses an artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool for
the purpose of utilization review or utilization management functions, based in whole or in part
on medical necessity, shall comply with this subsection and shall ensure all of the following:
(A) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool bases its determination on
the following information, as applicable:
(i) An insured’s medical or other clinical history.
of 4

(ii) Individual clinical circumstances as presented by the requesting provider.
(iii) Other relevant clinical information contained in the insured’s medical or other
clinical record.
(B) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not base its
determination solely on a group dataset.
(C) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tools criteria and guidelines
complies with this chapter and applicable state and federal law.
(D) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not supplant health
care provider decision-making.
(E) The use of the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not
discriminate, directly or indirectly, against any insured in violation of state or federal law,
including but not limited to chapter 151B.
(F) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is fairly and equitably
applied, including in accordance with any applicable regulations and guidance issued by state
and federal agencies.
(G) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool is open to inspection for
audit or compliance reviews by the division and by the executive office of health and human
services pursuant to applicable state and federal law.
(H) Disclosures pertaining to the use and oversight of the artificial intelligence,
algorithm, or other software tool are contained in the written policies and procedures, as required
by subsection (a).
of 4

(I) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tools performance, use, and
outcomes are periodically reviewed and revised to maximize accuracy and reliability.
(J) Patient data is not used beyond its intended and stated purpose, and consistent with
state and federal law.
(K) The artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tool does not directly or
indirectly cause harm to the insured.
(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software
tool shall not deny, delay, or modify health care services based, in whole or in part, on medical
necessity. A determination of medical necessity shall be made only by a licensed physician or a
licensed health care professional competent to evaluate the specific clinical issues involved in the
health care services requested by the provider, as provided in subsection (a), by reviewing and
considering the requesting providers recommendation, the insured’s medical or other clinical
history, as applicable, and individual clinical circumstances.
(3) For purposes of this subsection, artificial intelligence means an engineered or
machine-based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit
objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or
virtual environments.
(4) This subsection shall apply to utilization review or utilization management functions
that prospectively, retrospectively, or concurrently review requests for covered health care
services.
of 4

(5) A health benefit plan subject to this subsection shall comply with applicable state and
federal rules and guidance regarding the use of artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other
software tools. The division and the executive office of health and human services may issue
guidance to implement this paragraph within one year of the adoption of state or federal rules or
the issuance of guidance by the federal Department of Health and Human Services regarding the
use of artificial intelligence, algorithm, or other software tools. Such guidance shall not be
subject to chapter 30A.
(6) This subsection applies to a MassHealth managed health benefit plan only to the
extent that the executive office of health and human services obtains any necessary federal
approvals, and federal financial participation is not otherwise jeopardized.
of 4